FST/hsi/morph_hsi_adj.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    %+ADJ
    %+MASC %+FEM
    %+SG %+PL

LEXICON Root
noko adjective;
tʰāṛgo adjective;
parono adjective;
sokolo adjective;
sākko adjective;
tʰāllo adjective;

LEXICON adjective
%+ADJ adj_gender;

LEXICON adj_gender
%+MASC adj_number;
%+FEM adj_number;

LEXICON adj_number
%+SG #;
%+PL #;
